Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1310
Commission; obligations; state, county, or city; not liable.

The bonds, notes, obligations or liabilities of a commission shall not be a debt of the State of Nebraska or of the city or county for which the commission is established and neither the state, city, nor the county shall be liable thereon or therefor, nor shall such bonds, notes, obligations or liabilities be payable out of any money other than the money of the commission issuing or incurring the same.

Laws 1971, LB 1003, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2610.